Maryland, session 2025, SB0659.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Commercial Law
4A–508.
(A) THIS SECTION APPLIES TO ANY FINANCIAL INSTITUTION OPERATING IN
THE STATE.
(B) THE COMMISSIONER OF FINANCIAL REGULATION SHALL ADOPT
CONSUMER PROTECTION REGULATIONS FOR FINANCIAL INSTITUTIONS THAT
INITIATE A DOMESTIC ELECTRONIC FUNDS TRANSFER UNDER THIS TITLE.
(C) THE COMMISSIONER SHALL PROVIDE CONSUMERS WITH PROTECTIONS
THAT ARE CONSISTENT WITH THOSE AFFORDED TO CONSUMERS WHO INITIATE AN
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *sb0659*

SENATE BILL 659
ELECTRONIC FUNDS TRANSFER AS DEFINED IN 15 U.S.C. § 1693(A)(7),
NOTWITHSTANDING ANY EXEMPTIONS STATED IN THAT PROVISION.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That if this Act is held to be
inapplicable to federally chartered financial institutions, or financial institutions operating
in the State that are chartered outside the State, for any reason in a court of competent
jurisdiction, this Act, with no further action required by the General Assembly, shall be
abrogated and of no further force and effect.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.